California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 and any gaps that exist to support adoptive families connecting to resources before crises escalate to wraparound or residential placement and shall provide to the Legislature proposed statutory changes no later than August 1, 2028.

(k) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions and amended forms, which shall be exempt from submission to or review by the Office of
 Administrative Law. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations no later than January 1, 2031.

 (l) This section is operative on July 1, 2027, or the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System and the Statewide Child Welfare Information System (currently the California Automated Response and Engagement System (CWS-CARES)) can perform the necessary automation to implement the Tiered Rate Structure described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, whichever is later.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 107, Sec. 7) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 32.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2027, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16122.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to support permanency for children and nonminor dependents who need permanent homes through adoption or guardianship. Historically, the adoption of children from foster care has been supported by private adoption agencies pursuant to the Private Agency Adoptions Reimbursement Program. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage counties and private adoption agencies to continue supporting these children and families both pre- and post-permanency, which supports the counties and state in meeting federal and state-required permanency outcomes for foster
 children. In light of the enactment and implementation of the 2011 Realignment and the Continuum of Care Reform, it is necessary to change the construction of the Private Agency Adoptions Reimbursement Program in order to allow for local control of the program and ensure the services provided are consistent with the Continuum of Care Reform, and to allow unspent funds to be utilized to support permanency activities undertaken outside of the Private Agency Adoptions Reimbursement Program.

(b) (1) As set forth in this section, a county child welfare agency shall compensate private adoption agencies licensed
 pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code for the costs of supporting families through the process of adopting children or nonminor dependents eligible for the Adoption Assistance Program benefits pursuant to Section 16120.

(2) The agencies described in paragraph (1) shall be compensated for adoption services pursuant to this section. One-half of the compensation shall be paid at the time the adoptive placement agreement is signed, unless the adoption agency opts to be paid in full at the time
 of finalization of the adoption. The remainder shall be paid at the time the adoption petition is granted by the court. Reimbursement procedures shall be established by the department in consultation with the counties and private adoption agencies.

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed to authorize reimbursement to private agencies for intercountry adoption services.

(c) Effective July 1, 2020, the reimbursement made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be eight thousand dollars ($8,000) for children adopted from families approved by dually licensed private nonprofit foster family and adoption agencies, and six thousand six hundred dollars ($6,600) for all other children. These rates shall apply to children for whom an adoption placement agreement is signed on or
 after that effective date. Children for whom an adoption placement agreement was signed prior to that date shall be reimbursed pursuant to the rates in effect prior to July 1, 2020, and those claims shall be paid by the department pursuant to the process in effect at that time under former Section 16122, with the exception that a cost report shall not be required for adoptions in process as of July 1, 2020.

(d) To the extent that reimbursements made pursuant to subdivision (b) total less than the amount provided to the county for those services, the county may, at its discretion, utilize unspent funds for additional activities related to permanency, including, but not limited
 to, pre- and post-permanency support related to the establishment of adoptions and guardianships for foster children. This may include services outlined in guidance from the department issued in All-County Letter 18-142.

(e) (1) The department shall work with counties and representatives of adoption agencies to ensure a smooth transition to the new structure under this section, which shall include, but not be limited to, a review of existing guidance and claim forms and instructions and any necessary updates to reflect the new process.

(2) The department, counties, and adoption agencies shall develop
 language for the placement agreement signed between the county and a dually licensed private nonprofit foster family and adoption agency to ensure compensation is made pursuant to this section should the child transition to an adoption with a family who is under the auspices of that agency.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 827, Sec. 3.   (AB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16123.

The provisions of Section 16120, permitting the payment of adoption assistance until a child attains 18 or 21 years of age if the child has mental or physical handicaps, or effective January 1, 2012, up to 21 years of age, if the child or nonminor meets the criteria specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 16120, shall be effective as long as federal funds are available under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (Part E (commencing with Section 670) of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code), and the state continues to exercise its option to extend payments up to 21 years of age, pursuant to Section 473(a)(4) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 673(a)(4)). When those funds cease to be available, the maximum length for payment of the Adoption Assistance Program shall be five years except
 in instances in which there is a continuing need, related to a chronic health condition of the child which necessitated the initial financial assistance. On and after October 1, 1992, the parent may petition the department or the responsible county to continue financial assistance up to the age of majority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 846, Sec. 51.   (AB 1712)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16124.

(a) (1) Upon the appropriation of funds by the Legislature for the purposes set forth in this section, the State Department of Social Services shall establish a project in four counties and one state district office of the department to provide preadoption and postadoption services to ensure the successful adoption of children and youth who have been in foster care 18 months or more, are at least nine years of age, and are placed in an unrelated foster home or in a group home.

(2) The participating entities shall include the following:

(A) City and County of San Francisco.

(B) County of Los Angeles.

(C) Two additional counties and one state district office, based on criteria developed by the department in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, which shall demonstrate geographic diversity.

(3) A county that elects to apply for funding pursuant to this section shall submit an application to the department no later than a date determined by the department to ensure timely allocation of funds. The department shall review the applications received, and select the eligible counties in accordance with this section.

(b) Each entity identified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall receive funding to provide preadoption and postadoption services to the adoptive parents and the targeted population identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(1) Preadoption and postadoption services for the child and each family may include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Individualized or other recruitment efforts.

(B) Postadoption services, including respite care.

(C) Behavioral health services.

(D) Peer support groups.

(E) Information and referral services.

(F) Other locally designed services, as appropriate.

(G) Relative search efforts.

(H) Training of adoptive
 parents, foster youth, or mentoring families.

(I) Mediation services.

(J) Facilitation of siblings in the same placement.

(K) Facilitation of postadoption contact.

(L) Engaging youth in permanency decisionmaking.

(M) Any service or support necessary to resolve any identified barrier to adoption.

(2) The services specified in paragraph (1) may be provided directly by the county, contracted for by the county, or provided through reimbursement to the family, as approved by the county.

(c) The amount of funding provided in the appropriation of funds provided by the
 annual Budget Act to each county participating in the project shall be allocated as follows:

(1) Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) to the City and County of San Francisco.

(2) One million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,250,000) to the County of Los Angeles.

(3) A total of two million dollars ($2,000,000), to be awarded to the two additional counties and the district office selected pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), minus any funds subtracted by the department for the purpose of administering the project. The amount of funds provided to the department for administration of the project, including the costs of collecting and analyzing data pursuant to subdivision (h) and developing the information pursuant to subdivision (i), shall not exceed three hundred thousand
 dollars ($300,000).

(4) If the appropriated amount in the annual Budget Act differs from the total amount specified above, then the funds shall be distributed in the same proportion as the amounts listed in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.

(d) Funds shall be allocated to the counties pursuant to subdivision (c) no later than January 1 of each year, and shall remain available for expenditure until June 30, 2010.

(e) (1) The department shall seek approval for any federal matching funds that may be available to supplement the project.

(2) The implementation of the project shall not be dependent upon the receipt of federal funding.

(3) Project funds shall supplement, and
 not supplant, existing federal, state, and local funds, and shall be used only in accordance with the terms and conditions of the project.

(4) No expenditure made for services specified in subdivision (b) may be made to the extent that it renders the family ineligible for federal adoption assistance.

(f) The project shall be implemented only upon the adoption of a resolution adopted by each county board of supervisors.

(g) The department shall work with the counties to develop the requirements for the project, including the number of families that may participate in the project, given the available resources, and guidelines for data collection, as required by subdivision (h).

(h) (1) The department shall work with the participating
 county and the state district office to analyze the effects of the project.

(2) Measures assessed by the state and counties shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(A) The extent to which the adoptions of the targeted population identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) increased as a result of the project.

(B) The number of families and children served by the project.

(C) The type and amount of preadoption and postadoption services that were provided to children and families under the project.

(i) The department shall provide information to the Legislature on the results of the project by May 31, 2011.

(j) Adoption programs in the project counties shall be encouraged to create public-private partnerships with private adoption agencies to maximize their success in improving permanent outcomes for older foster youth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 257.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

16125.

A foster child whose adoption has become final, who is receiving or is eligible to receive Adoption Assistance Program assistance, including Medi-Cal, and whose foster care court supervision has been terminated, shall be provided medically necessary specialty mental health services by the local mental health plan in the county of residence of his or her adoptive parents, pursuant to all of the following:

(a) The host county mental health plan shall be responsible for submitting the treatment authorization request (TAR) to the mental health plan in the county of origin.

(b) The requesting public or private service
 provider shall prepare the TAR.

(c) The county of origin shall retain responsibility for authorization and reauthorization of services utilizing an expedited TAR process.

(d) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall convene a stakeholder group to identify barriers to the provision of mental health services by mental health professionals with specialized clinical training in adoption or permanency issues to children who are receiving services pursuant to this section. The stakeholder group shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following persons:

(A) Adoptive parents.

(B) Former foster youth.

(C) Representatives from the mental health and child welfare fields, including associations representing county mental health departments and private organizations providing specialty mental health services.

(D) Representatives from mental health and social work graduate degree-granting postsecondary education institutions.

(E) Representatives from relevant state
 and local agencies.

(2) The stakeholder group shall, on or before January 31, 2016, make specific recommendations for voluntary measures available to state and local government agencies and private entities, as appropriate, to address those barriers. The department shall collect existing research and professional literature pertinent to the need for specialized clinical training in adoption and permanency issues, and shall distribute the information to the stakeholder group for consideration and use in making its recommendations. The stakeholder group shall coordinate with, and endeavor not to duplicate, existing local, state, or national initiatives.

(3) A recommendation made pursuant to paragraph (2) shall not be construed to be binding on any state or local government agency or private entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 766, Sec. 1.   (AB 1790)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.2. State Adoption Services [16130. - 16133.]

16130.

In any county which does not have a county adoption agency established pursuant to Section 16100, the department may establish services incident to the relinquishment of children for adoption. The services shall be provided in such manner as may be deemed advisable by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 879.)
-------------------------------------------

16131.

It is the intent of the Legislature to conform state statutes to federal legislation, including the Preventing Sex Trafficking and Strengthening Families Act (Public Law 113-183) and the Adoption and Safe Families Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-89), and to reinvest any incentive payments received through implementation of the federal act into the child welfare system in order to provide adoption services and other legal permanency options for children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 425, Sec. 25.   (SB 794)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16131.5.

(a) The state shall reinvest adoption and guardianship incentive payments received through the implementation of the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351) and the Preventing Sex Trafficking and Strengthening Families Act (Public Law 113-183) into the child welfare system, in order to provide legal permanency outcomes for older children, including, but not limited to, adoption, guardianship, and reunification of children whose reunification services were previously terminated.

(b) The incentive payments received pursuant to subdivision (a), upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute, shall be allocated by the State
 Department of Social Services to the counties, and the department for a county in which the department serves as an adoption agency, based on documented increases in legal permanency outcomes for older children achieved by each county, as determined by the department, in consultation with counties, for the purposes specified in this section.

(c) A county, or the department when it acts as the adoption agency for a county, shall use adoption and guardianship incentive payment funds to improve or sustain legal permanency outcomes for older children.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supplant funds currently being spent on programs to provide legal permanency outcomes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 425, Sec. 26.   (SB 794)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16132.

It is the intent of the Legislature to conform state statutes to recently enacted federal legislation, the Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351) and to expend savings resulting from changes in eligibility for adoption assistance on services, including, but not limited to, postadoption assistance, that may be provided under Title IV-B and IV-E of the federal Social Security Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 222, Sec. 3.   (AB 154)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

16133.

On and after July 1, 2011, when a person has been an employee of the State Department of Social Services within the 12-month period prior to his or her employment by a county, the board of supervisors, to the extent feasible, may allow that person to retain, as a county employee, those employee benefits to which that person was entitled or had accumulated as an employee of the State Department of Social Services, or provide that employee with comparable benefits provided for other county employees whose services as county employees is equal to the state service of the former employee of the State Department of Social Services. These benefits include, but are not limited to, retirement benefits, seniority rights under civil service, accumulated vacation, and sick leave.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 114.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.3. Adoption of Alcohol- and Drug-Exposed and HIV Positive Children [16135. - 16135.30.]

16135.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish a program for special training and services to facilitate the adoption of children who are HIV positive, or born to a substance-abusing mother. This program shall be available to any county that elects to participate pursuant to procedures established by the department.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1014, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 116.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16135.1.

(a) “Eligible child” means any child who meets the requirements of paragraph (1) or (2), and paragraph (3).

(1) Any child who has a condition or symptoms resulting from, or are suspected as resulting from, alcohol or substance abuse by the mother.

(2) Any child who is HIV positive.

(3) Any child who meets the requirements of either paragraph (1) or (2) and who meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The child is a dependent child of the court.

(B) The child has an adoption case plan and resides with a preadoptive or adoptive caregiver, or the plan is to transition and move the child to a preadoptive or adoptive caregiver.

(b) “TIES for Adoption” means Training, Intervention, Education, and Services for Adoption, a training project developed and implemented by the Adoptions Division of the Los Angeles County Department of Children’s Services, the UCLA Center for Healthier Children, Families, and Communities, and the UCLA Psychology Department, a demonstration project funded by the Federal Adoption Opportunities Program from September 30, 1995, to December 31, 1997, inclusive.

(c) “HIV positive” means having a human immunodeficiency virus infection.

(d) “Specialized in-home health care” means, but is not limited to, those services identified by the child’s primary physician as appropriately administered by a prospective adoptive parent who has been trained by mental health or health care professionals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1014, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

16135.10.

(a) In order to promote successful adoptions of substance and alcohol exposed court dependent children, participating counties shall maintain a program of specialized training and supportive services to families adopting court dependent children who are either HIV positive or assessed as being prenatally exposed to alcohol or a controlled substance.

(b) The program shall include respite services. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, respite services shall be funded with a 30 percent nonfederal county share consistent with the normal sharing ratio for child welfare services. This county share may be provided with county general funds, in-kind contributions, or other funds. The source of the county share shall meet all applicable state and federal requirements and provide counties with maximum flexibility.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the
 requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1014, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 117.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16135.13.

(a) A participating county shall provide special training to recruited adoptive parents to care for eligible children. The training curriculum shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Orientation.

(2) Effect of alcohol and controlled substances on the fetus and children.

(3) Normal and abnormal infant and early childhood development.

(4) Special medical needs and disabilities.

(5) Recovery from addiction to alcohol and controlled substances.

(6) Self-care for the caregiver.

(7) HIV/AIDS in children.

(8) Issues in parenting and providing lifelong permanency and substance abuse prevention to, children with prenatal alcohol and other controlled substances exposure.

(9) Issues specific to caring for a child who tests HIV positive.

(b) Participating counties may provide the same special training to relative caretakers in the process of adopting program-eligible children.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1014, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

16135.14.

(a) The county shall determine whether a child is eligible for services pursuant to this section.

(b) A participating county shall select a specialized prospective adoptive home for the child.

(c) If an eligible child’s adoptive placement changes from one participating county to another participating county, the child shall remain eligible for services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1014, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

16135.16.

The requirements of this section may be met by the implementation of the TIES for Adoption program as defined in Subdivision (b) of Section 16135.1.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1014, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 118.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16135.17.

Participating counties shall prepare an adoption services case plan pursuant to regulations adopted by the department and arrange for nonmedical support services. Nonmedical support services shall include respite care for specially trained prospective adoptive parents, including relative caretakers, pursuant to regulations adopted by the department. Nonmedical support services may also include, but are not limited to, temperament and behavior management training, consultation regarding medical and psychological issues and services, and educational advocacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1014, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

16135.25.

The department shall do all of the following:

(a) Develop necessary procedures and standardized programs for a specialized adoptive home training project.

(b) Assist counties in coordinating sources of funding and services available to eligible children in order to maximize the social services provided to these children and avoid duplication of program funding.

(c) Require that participating counties coordinate available services for this population and their adoptive families.

(d) Provide to a requesting county information necessary to establish a program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1014, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

16135.30.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subdivisions (b) and (c) shall control the placement of a child pursuant to this chapter.

(b) A county may place children who are alcohol or controlled substance exposed or HIV positive in prospective adoptive homes pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) If a county makes a placement pursuant to subdivision (b), a preadoptive parent trained by health care professionals may provide specialized in-home health care to that child who was placed in their home for the purpose of adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1014, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Foster Child Ombudsman Program [16160. - 16167.]

16160.

The Legislature finds and declares that the people of California have benefited from the establishment of a long-term care ombudsperson pursuant to Section 9710 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and a childcare ombudsperson program pursuant to Section 1596.872a of the Health and Safety Code. The Legislature further finds it is essential to maintain the nonpartisan nature, integrity, and impartiality of ombudsperson functions and services. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide similar protections for foster children by establishing a foster care ombudsperson
 program within the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   (AB 317)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16161.

(a) The Office of the State Foster Care Ombudsperson shall be established as an autonomous entity within the department for the purpose of providing children who are placed in foster care, either voluntarily or pursuant to Section 300 and Sections 600 and following, with a means to resolve issues related to their care, placement, or services. The work of the office falls within the provisions of subparagraphs (I) and (J) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 827, and the office shall meet all of the provisions and requirements of that section with regard to access,
 confidentiality, and the use of information.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “foster care” includes all of the following:

(1) Voluntary placement in a licensed or approved children’s residential facility or with an approved resource family.

(2) Placement in a licensed or approved children’s residential facility, with an approved resource family, or with a family
 pending approval as a resource family, or placement pursuant to a juvenile court order, pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 300) and Article 14 (commencing with Section 601) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2.

(3) Placement by a governmental entity in a residential facility or home subject to licensure, certification, or approval by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to the California Community Care Facilities Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 293, Sec. 2.   (AB 317)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16162.

(a) The Director of Social Services, in consultation with, and after receiving a list of possible nominees from, a committee of at least five interested individuals that are described in this subdivision, and after obtaining the committee’s input, shall appoint an ombudsperson who is qualified by training and experience to perform the duties of the office for a term of four years. The director may reappoint the ombudsperson for consecutive terms. The director shall select the committee members, the majority of whom shall be representatives of nonprofit children’s advocacy organizations and current or former foster youth.

(b) The
 ombudsperson shall, in the performance of their duties during the duration of their appointment, be independent and the exercise of their discretion related to the duties and powers set forth in this chapter shall not be controlled, supervised, or directed, directly or indirectly, by the director or any other official. The ombudsperson shall devote their entire time to the duties and powers set forth in this chapter and may not be removed from office for exercising their independence and discretion in furtherance of those duties and powers.

(c) If the term of an ombudsperson expires without the appointment of a successor under this chapter, the incumbent ombudsperson may continue in office until a successor is appointed. If the ombudsperson dies, resigns, becomes ineligible to serve, or is removed or suspended from office, the director
 shall designate an acting ombudsperson until the ombudsperson is appointed. The director shall appoint a new ombudsperson pursuant to this section within the nine months from the date the office became vacant. In no event shall the acting ombudsperson remain in office longer than nine months before a new ombudsperson is appointed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 293, Sec. 3.   (AB 317)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16163.

The department shall hire the necessary personnel to perform the functions of the office. Priority shall be given to former foster youth in hiring decisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 311, Sec. 66.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16164.

(a) The Office of the State Foster Care Ombudsperson shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Disseminate information and provide training and technical assistance to foster youth, social workers, probation officers, tribes’ child welfare agencies, child welfare organizations, children’s advocacy groups, consumer and service provider organizations, and other interested parties on the rights of children and youth in foster care, reasonable and prudent parent standards, and the services provided by the office. The rights of children and youth in foster care are listed in Section 16001.9. The information shall include methods of contacting the office and notification that conversations
 with the office may be disclosed to other persons, as necessary to adequately investigate and resolve a complaint.

(B) At the end of every two-year legislative session, review amendments to the laws applicable to foster youth and determine whether updates to the rights listed in Section 16001.9 should be recommended in the compilation prepared pursuant to paragraph (8). The office shall update the standardized information prepared pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), and any training materials prepared pursuant to subparagraph (A), in accordance with the legislative review.

(2) Receive complaints made by or on behalf of children placed in foster care, related to their care, placement, or services, including for children placed by the Office of Refugee Resettlement of
 the United States Department of Health and Human Services in residential facilities and homes that are subject to regulation by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to the California Community Care Facilities Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) or pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 16519.5) of Chapter 5.

(3) Decide, in its discretion, whether to investigate a complaint, or refer complaints to another agency for investigation. After rendering a decision to investigate a complaint, attempt to resolve the complaint without using a judicial or administrative proceeding.

(4) Upon rendering a decision to investigate a complaint from a complainant, notify the complainant of the intention to investigate. If the office declines to investigate a complaint or continue an investigation, the office shall notify the complainant of the reason for the action of the office.

(5) Update the complainant on the progress of the investigation and the attempts to resolve the complaint, and notify the complainant of the final outcome.

(6) Document the number, source, origin, location, and nature of complaints.

(7) Receive data from the State Department of Education regarding complaints about foster youth education rights made through the
 uniform complaint process.

(8) (A) Compile and make available to the Legislature all data collected over the course of the year, including, but not limited to, the number of contacts to the office, the number of complaints made, including the type and source of those complaints, the number of investigations performed by the office, the trends and issues that arose in the course of investigating complaints, the number of referrals made, the number of pending complaints, and a summary of the data received from the State Department of Education pursuant to paragraph (7). The office shall include recommendations consistent with this data for improving the child welfare system.

(B) Present this compiled data, on an annual basis, at appropriate child welfare
 conferences, forums, and other events, as determined by the department, that may include presentations to, but are not limited to, representatives of the Legislature, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, Chief Probation Officers of California, Indian tribes, child welfare agencies, child welfare organizations, children’s advocacy groups, consumer and service provider organizations, and other interested parties.

(C) It is the intent of the Legislature that representatives of the organizations described in subparagraph (B) consider this data in the development of any recommendations offered toward improving the child welfare system.

(D) The compiled data shall be posted so that it is available to the public on the existing internet website of the office.

(E) Nothing shall preclude the office from issuing data, findings, or reports other than the annual compilation of data described in this paragraph.

(9) Have access to copies of any record of a state or local agency, and contractors with state and local agencies, that is necessary to carry out their responsibilities, and may meet or communicate with any foster child in their placement or elsewhere.

(b) The office may establish, in consultation with a committee of interested individuals, regional or local foster care ombudsperson offices for the purposes of expediting investigations and resolving complaints, subject to appropriations in the annual Budget Act.

(c) (1) Information obtained by the office from a complaint, regardless of whether it is investigated by the office, referred to another entity for investigation, or determined not to be the proper subject of an investigation, shall remain confidential under relevant state and federal confidentiality laws. Disclosure of information that is not confidential under state and federal confidentiality laws shall occur only as necessary to carry out the mission of the
 office, including as necessary to provide explanation and support for the office’s recommendations for improving the child welfare system to the Legislature and state and local agencies that provide services and supports to children placed in foster care.

(2) The ombudsperson shall maintain confidentiality with respect to the identities of the complainants or witnesses coming before them, except insofar as disclosure may be necessary to enable the ombudsperson to carry out the duties of the office set forth in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a). The ombudsperson may not disclose a record that is confidential under relevant state and federal confidentiality laws.

(3) If a child or nonminor dependent is represented by counsel pursuant to Section
 317, the office may notify the counsel of a complaint in order for counsel to satisfy their obligations specified under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 317. If appropriate, the office may also share the outcome of any investigation performed by the office with the child’s or nonminor dependent’s counsel.

(d) The office shall provide administrative and technical assistance to county, regional, or local foster care ombudsperson’s offices, including, but not limited to, assistance in developing policies and procedures consistent with the policies and procedures used by the office.

(e) (1) The office, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, Chief Probation Officers of California, Indian tribes located in the
 state, foster youth advocate and support groups, groups representing children, families, foster parents, children’s facilities, and other interested parties, shall develop standardized information explaining the rights specified in Section 16001.9. The information shall be developed in an age-appropriate manner, and shall reflect any relevant licensing requirements with respect to foster care providers’ responsibilities to adequately supervise children in care.

(2) The office, counties, foster care providers, and others shall use the information developed in paragraph (1) in carrying out their responsibilities to inform foster children and youth of their rights pursuant to Section 1530.91 of the Health and Safety Code, Sections 27 and 16501.1, and this section.

(3) The office shall